South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4635.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-79-60(4) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (4) provide for an a one-month automatic renewal option, for a duration of no longer than one month, which to be enforceable must be disclosed in bold type of at least fourteen-point font on the front page of the contract and must be initialed by the customer. The customer will be given the ability to opt-in to may accept the automatic renewal provision at the time the initial contract is executed by initialing an opt-in provision. Near No later than ten days before the expiration of the initial contract, the facility shall notify the customer in writing at the customer's last known address or electronically, by means specified in the initial contract, of the automatic renewal option which the customer selected at the time the initial contract was executed. Price may not increase or decrease in an automatically renewed contract without written notice to the customer of at least thirty but not more than sixty days prior to the effective date of the change in price; SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. /s/Sen. Corbin                                                      /s/Rep. Newton /s/Sen. Garrett                                                      /s/Rep. Davis /s/Sen. Tedder                                                      /s/Rep. Moore On Part of the Senate                                            On Part of the House ----XX----